Illinois, session 104th, HB2366.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/4)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1004)7    Sec. 4. Environmental Protection Agency; establishment; 8duties. 9    (a) There is established in the Executive Branch of the 10State Government an agency to be known as the Environmental 11Protection Agency. This Agency shall be under the supervision 12and direction of a Director who shall be appointed by the 13Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The term of 14office of the Director shall expire on the third Monday of 15January in odd numbered years, provided that he or she shall 16hold office until a successor is appointed and has qualified. 17For terms beginning after January 18, 2019 (the effective date 18of Public Act 100-1179) and before January 16, 2023, the 19Director's annual salary shall be an amount equal to 15% more 20than the Director's annual salary as of December 31, 2018. The 21calculation of the 2018 salary base for this adjustment shall 22not include any cost of living adjustments, as authorized by 23Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General Assembly, for   HB2366 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1the period beginning July 1, 2009 to June 30, 2019. Beginning 2July 1, 2019 and each July 1 thereafter, the Director shall 3receive an increase in salary based on a cost of living 4adjustment as authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 586th General Assembly. Notwithstanding any other provision of 6law, for terms beginning on or after January 16, 2023, the 7Director shall receive an annual salary of $180,000 or as set 8by the Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 2023, and on 9each July 1 thereafter, the Director shall receive an increase 10in salary based on a cost of living adjustment as authorized by 11Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General Assembly. The 12Director, in accord with the Personnel Code, shall employ and 13direct such personnel, and shall provide for such laboratory 14and other facilities, as may be necessary to carry out the 15purposes of this Act. In addition, the Director may by 16agreement secure such services as he or she may deem necessary 17from any other department, agency, or unit of the State 18Government, and may employ and compensate such consultants and 19technical assistants as may be required.20    (b) The Agency shall have the duty to collect and 21disseminate such information, acquire such technical data, and 22conduct such experiments as may be required to carry out the 23purposes of this Act, including ascertainment of the quantity 24and nature of discharges from any contaminant source and data 25on those sources, and to operate and arrange for the operation 26of devices for the monitoring of environmental quality.  HB2366 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1    (c) The Agency shall have authority to conduct a program 2of continuing surveillance and of regular or periodic 3inspection of actual or potential contaminant or noise 4sources, of public water supplies, and of refuse disposal 5sites.6    (d) In accordance with constitutional limitations, the 7Agency shall have authority to enter at all reasonable times 8upon any private or public property for the purpose of:9        (1) Inspecting and investigating to ascertain possible 10    violations of this Act, any rule or regulation adopted 11    under this Act, any permit or term or condition of a 12    permit, or any Board order; or13        (2) In accordance with the provisions of this Act, 14    taking whatever preventive or corrective action, including 15    but not limited to removal or remedial action, that is 16    necessary or appropriate whenever there is a release or a 17    substantial threat of a release of (A) a hazardous 18    substance or pesticide or (B) petroleum from an 19    underground storage tank.20    (e) The Agency shall have the duty to investigate 21violations of this Act, any rule or regulation adopted under 22this Act, any permit or term or condition of a permit, or any 23Board order; to issue administrative citations as provided in 24Section 31.1 of this Act; and to take such summary enforcement 25action as is provided for by Section 34 of this Act.26    (f) The Agency shall appear before the Board in any   HB2366 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1hearing upon a petition for variance or time-limited water 2quality standard, the denial of a permit, or the validity or 3effect of a rule or regulation of the Board, and shall have the 4authority to appear before the Board in any hearing under the 5Act.6    (g) The Agency shall have the duty to administer, in 7accord with Title X of this Act, such permit and certification 8systems as may be established by this Act or by regulations 9adopted thereunder. The Agency may enter into written 10delegation agreements with any department, agency, or unit of 11State or local government under which all or portions of this 12duty may be delegated for public water supply storage and 13transport systems, sewage collection and transport systems, 14air pollution control sources with uncontrolled emissions of 15100 tons per year or less and application of algicides to 16waters of the State. Such delegation agreements will require 17that the work to be performed thereunder will be in accordance 18with Agency criteria, subject to Agency review, and shall 19include such financial and program auditing by the Agency as 20may be required.21    (h) The Agency shall have authority to require the 22submission of complete plans and specifications from any 23applicant for a permit required by this Act or by regulations 24thereunder, and to require the submission of such reports 25regarding actual or potential violations of this Act, any rule 26or regulation adopted under this Act, any permit or term or   HB2366 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1condition of a permit, or any Board order, as may be necessary 2for the purposes of this Act.3    (i) The Agency shall have authority to make 4recommendations to the Board for the adoption of regulations 5under Title VII of the Act.6    (j) The Agency shall have the duty to represent the State 7of Illinois in any and all matters pertaining to plans, 8procedures, or negotiations for interstate compacts or other 9governmental arrangements relating to environmental 10protection.11    (k) The Agency shall have the authority to accept, 12receive, and administer on behalf of the State any grants, 13gifts, loans, indirect cost reimbursements, or other funds 14made available to the State from any source for purposes of 15this Act or for air or water pollution control, public water 16supply, solid waste disposal, noise abatement, or other 17environmental protection activities, surveys, or programs. Any 18federal funds received by the Agency pursuant to this 19subsection shall be deposited in a trust fund with the State 20Treasurer and held and disbursed by him in accordance with 21Treasurer as Custodian of Funds Act, provided that such monies 22shall be used only for the purposes for which they are 23contributed and any balance remaining shall be returned to the 24contributor.25    The Agency is authorized to promulgate such regulations 26and enter into such contracts as it may deem necessary for   HB2366 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1carrying out the provisions of this subsection.2    (l) The Agency is hereby designated as water pollution 3agency for the state for all purposes of the Federal Water 4Pollution Control Act, as amended; as implementing agency for 5the State for all purposes of the Safe Drinking Water Act, 6Public Law 93-523, as now or hereafter amended, except Section 71425 of that Act; as air pollution agency for the state for all 8purposes of the Clean Air Act of 1970, Public Law 91-604, 9approved December 31, 1970, as amended; and as solid waste 10agency for the state for all purposes of the Solid Waste 11Disposal Act, Public Law 89-272, approved October 20, 1965, 12and amended by the Resource Recovery Act of 1970, Public Law 1391-512, approved October 26, 1970, as amended, and amended by 14the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, (P.L. 1594-580) approved October 21, 1976, as amended; as noise 16control agency for the state for all purposes of the Noise 17Control Act of 1972, Public Law 92-574, approved October 27, 181972, as amended; and as implementing agency for the State for 19all purposes of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, 20Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-510), as 21amended; and otherwise as pollution control agency for the 22State pursuant to federal laws integrated with the foregoing 23laws, for financing purposes or otherwise. The Agency is 24hereby authorized to take all action necessary or appropriate 25to secure to the State the benefits of such federal Acts, 26provided that the Agency shall transmit to the United States   HB2366 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1without change any standards adopted by the Pollution Control 2Board pursuant to Section 5(c) of this Act. This subsection 3(l) of Section 4 shall not be construed to bar or prohibit the 4Environmental Protection Trust Fund Commission from accepting, 5receiving, and administering on behalf of the State any 6grants, gifts, loans or other funds for which the Commission 7is eligible pursuant to the Environmental Protection Trust 8Fund Act. The Agency is hereby designated as the State agency 9for all purposes of administering the requirements of Section 10313 of the federal Emergency Planning and Community 11Right-to-Know Act of 1986.12    Any municipality, sanitary district, or other political 13subdivision, or any Agency of the State or interstate Agency, 14which makes application for loans or grants under such federal 15Acts shall notify the Agency of such application; the Agency 16may participate in proceedings under such federal Acts.17    (m) The Agency shall have authority, consistent with 18Section 5(c) and other provisions of this Act, and for 19purposes of Section 303(e) of the Federal Water Pollution 20Control Act, as now or hereafter amended, to engage in 21planning processes and activities and to develop plans in 22cooperation with units of local government, state agencies and 23officers, and other appropriate persons in connection with the 24jurisdiction or duties of each such unit, agency, officer or 25person. Public hearings shall be held on the planning process, 26at which any person shall be permitted to appear and be heard,   HB2366 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1pursuant to procedural regulations promulgated by the Agency.2    (n) In accordance with the powers conferred upon the 3Agency by Sections 10(g), 13(b), 19, 22(d) and 25 of this Act, 4the Agency shall have authority to establish and enforce 5minimum standards for the operation of laboratories relating 6to analyses and laboratory tests for air pollution, water 7pollution, noise emissions, contaminant discharges onto land 8and sanitary, chemical, and mineral quality of water 9distributed by a public water supply. The Agency may enter 10into formal working agreements with other departments or 11agencies of state government under which all or portions of 12this authority may be delegated to the cooperating department 13or agency.14    (o) The Agency shall have the authority to issue 15certificates of competency to persons and laboratories meeting 16the minimum standards established by the Agency in accordance 17with Section 4(n) of this Act and to promulgate and enforce 18regulations relevant to the issuance and use of such 19certificates. The Agency may enter into formal working 20agreements with other departments or agencies of state 21government under which all or portions of this authority may 22be delegated to the cooperating department or agency.23    (p) Except as provided in Section 17.7, the Agency shall 24have the duty to analyze samples as required from each public 25water supply to determine compliance with the contaminant 26levels specified by the Pollution Control Board. The maximum   HB2366 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1number of samples which the Agency shall be required to 2analyze for microbiological quality shall be 6 per month, but 3the Agency may, at its option, analyze a larger number each 4month for any supply. Results of sample analyses for 5additional required bacteriological testing, turbidity, 6residual chlorine and radionuclides are to be provided to the 7Agency in accordance with Section 19. Owners of water supplies 8may enter into agreements with the Agency to provide for 9reduced Agency participation in sample analyses.10    (q) The Agency shall have the authority to provide notice 11to any person who may be liable pursuant to Section 22.2(f) of 12this Act for a release or a substantial threat of a release of 13a hazardous substance or pesticide. Such notice shall include 14the identified response action and an opportunity for such 15person to perform the response action.16    (r) The Agency may enter into written delegation 17agreements with any unit of local government under which it 18may delegate all or portions of its inspecting, investigating 19and enforcement functions. Such delegation agreements shall 20require that work performed thereunder be in accordance with 21Agency criteria and subject to Agency review. Notwithstanding 22any other provision of law to the contrary, no unit of local 23government shall be liable for any injury resulting from the 24exercise of its authority pursuant to such a delegation 25agreement unless the injury is proximately caused by the 26willful and wanton negligence of an agent or employee of the   HB2366 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1unit of local government, and any policy of insurance coverage 2issued to a unit of local government may provide for the denial 3of liability and the nonpayment of claims based upon injuries 4for which the unit of local government is not liable pursuant 5to this subsection (r).6    (s) The Agency shall have authority to take whatever 7preventive or corrective action is necessary or appropriate, 8including but not limited to expenditure of monies 9appropriated from the Build Illinois Bond Fund for removal or 10remedial action, whenever any hazardous substance or pesticide 11is released or there is a substantial threat of such a release 12into the environment. The State, the Director, and any State 13employee shall be indemnified for any damages or injury 14arising out of or resulting from any action taken under this 15subsection. The Director of the Agency is authorized to enter 16into such contracts and agreements as are necessary to carry 17out the Agency's duties under this subsection.18    (t) The Agency shall have authority to distribute grants, 19subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, to units of 20local government for financing and construction of wastewater 21facilities in both incorporated and unincorporated areas. With 22respect to all monies appropriated from the Build Illinois 23Bond Fund for wastewater facility grants, the Agency shall 24make distributions in conformity with the rules and 25regulations established pursuant to the Anti-Pollution Bond 26Act (now repealed) or the General Obligation Bond Act.  HB2366 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1    (u) Pursuant to the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 2the Agency shall have the authority to adopt such rules as are 3necessary or appropriate for the Agency to implement Section 431.1 of this Act.5    (v) (Blank.)6    (w) Neither the State, nor the Director, nor the Board, 7nor any State employee shall be liable for any damages or 8injury arising out of or resulting from any action taken under 9subsection (s). 10    (x)(1) The Agency shall have authority to distribute 11grants, subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, to 12units of local government for financing and construction of 13public water supply facilities. With respect to all monies 14appropriated from the Build Illinois Bond Fund for public 15water supply grants, such grants shall be made in accordance 16with rules promulgated by the Agency. Such rules shall include 17a requirement for a local match of 30% of the total project 18cost for projects funded through such grants. 19    (2) The Agency shall not terminate a grant to a unit of 20local government for the financing and construction of public 21water supply facilities unless and until the Agency adopts 22rules that set forth precise and complete standards, pursuant 23to Section 5-20 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 24for the termination of such grants. The Agency shall not make 25determinations on whether specific grant conditions are 26necessary to ensure the integrity of a project or on whether   HB2366 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1subagreements shall be awarded, with respect to grants for the 2financing and construction of public water supply facilities, 3unless and until the Agency adopts rules that set forth 4precise and complete standards, pursuant to Section 5-20 of 5the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, for making such 6determinations. The Agency shall not issue a stop-work order 7in relation to such grants unless and until the Agency adopts 8precise and complete standards, pursuant to Section 5-20 of 9the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, for determining 10whether to issue a stop-work order.11    (y) The Agency shall have authority to release any person 12from further responsibility for preventive or corrective 13action under this Act following successful completion of 14preventive or corrective action undertaken by such person upon 15written request by the person.16    (z) To the extent permitted by any applicable federal law 17or regulation, for all work performed for State construction 18projects which are funded in whole or in part by a capital 19infrastructure bill enacted by the 96th General Assembly by 20sums appropriated to the Environmental Protection Agency, at 21least 50% of the total labor hours must be performed by actual 22residents of the State of Illinois. For purposes of this 23subsection, "actual residents of the State of Illinois" means 24persons domiciled in the State of Illinois. The Department of 25Labor shall promulgate rules providing for the enforcement of 26this subsection.  HB2366 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08969 BDA 19024 b1    (aa) The Agency shall may adopt rules requiring the 2electronic submission of any information required to be 3submitted to the Agency pursuant to any State or federal law or 4regulation or any court or Board order. Any rules adopted 5under this subsection (aa) must include, but are not limited 6to, identification of the information to be submitted 7electronically. The rules adopted under this subsection (aa) 8shall take effect no later than January 1, 2030. 9(Source: P.A. 102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 10103-616, eff. 7-1-24.)